Wyoming statutes. Title 33 Professions and Occupations
Article 1. In General

§ 33-40-101.
Short title.

This act is the “Occupational Therapy Practice Act”.

History.

Laws 1991, ch. 189, § 1.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “[t]his act,” referred to in this section, see § 33-40-102(a)(v).

§ 33-40-102.
Definitions.

As used in this act:

“Board” means the board of occupational therapy within the department of administration and information established by W.S.

33-40-114

;

“Occupational therapy assistant” or “OTA” means a person licensed under this act to assist in the practice of occupational therapy and who works under the supervision of an occupational therapist to perform tasks requiring occupational therapy professional knowledge or judgment;

“Occupational therapy” means:

through (H) Repealed by Laws 2016, ch. 104, § 2.

(J)

The therapeutic use of occupations including everyday life activities with individuals, groups, populations or organizations to support participation, performance and function in roles and situations in home, school, workplace, community and other settings;

(K)

The provision of services for habilitation, rehabilitation and the promotion of health and wellness to those who have or are at risk for developing an illness, injury, disease, disorder, condition, impairment, disability, activity limitation or participation restriction;

(M)

Addressing the physical, cognitive, psychosocial, sensory-perceptual and other aspects of performance in a variety of contexts and environments to support engagement in occupations, contexts and environments that affect physical and mental health, well-being and quality of life;

(N)

Performing the tasks of occupational therapy through personal interaction or appropriate use of telecommunication services and other communication technologies;

(O)

Performing the tasks of an occupational therapist or occupational therapy assistant commensurate with his education, training and experience;

(P)

The practice of occupational therapy which includes:

The evaluation of factors affecting activities of daily living, instrumental activities of daily living, rest and sleep, education, work, play, leisure and social participation;

The use of methods or approaches to direct the process of interventions; and

The use of interventions and procedures to promote or enhance safety and performance in activities of daily living, instrumental activities of daily living, rest and sleep, education, work, play, leisure and social participation.

“Occupational therapist” means a person licensed to practice occupational therapy under this act;

“Occupational therapy telehealth” means the provision of occupational therapy services across a distance, using telecommunications technology for the evaluation, intervention or consultation without requiring the occupational therapist and recipient to be physically located in the same place;

“Unprofessional conduct” means:

Committing any act involving a patient or which adversely relates to the practice of occupational therapy which results in a felony or misdemeanor conviction. A plea of guilty, nolo contendere or similar plea shall be considered a conviction;

Violating professional sexual boundaries by soliciting, encouraging, threatening, forcing or engaging in any sexual act or relationship with a patient, regardless of consent. A consensual sexual act or relationship shall not be deemed unprofessional conduct if the patient licensee relationship is terminated prior to the sexual act or relationship or if the sexual act or relationship occurs prior to any patient licensee relationship. The treatment of a spouse or significant other where the relationship is in place prior to the beginning of any patient licensee relationship shall not be unprofessional conduct if treatment is conducted without third party compensation;

Sexual harassment of a patient or staff member;

Suffering from an active substance abuse disorder that affects the occupational therapist’s ability to perform as an occupational therapist;

Denial of a license to practice occupational therapy or any disciplinary action against a licensee by any other state, the District of Columbia, territory or country for an action constituting unprofessional conduct in Wyoming;

Failure to report to the board known or reasonably suspected violations of the laws and regulations governing the practice of occupational therapy in Wyoming;

Submission of false information to the board;

Failure to notify the board within thirty (30) days of a malpractice final judgment or settlement involving the occupational therapist;

Aiding or abetting the practice of occupational therapy in violation of W.S.

33-40-103

by any person not licensed to practice in Wyoming;

Submission of false or materially misleading billing information;

Using any term other than “occupational therapist, registered,” “occupational therapist,” “OT,” “certified occupational therapist,” “COTA,” “occupational therapy assistant” or “OTA” to reflect licensure;

Employing, either directly or indirectly, any licensee under suspension or revocation, except as may be authorized by the board, or any person not licensed to practice occupational therapy to perform any task requiring licensure except that an unlicensed person may be employed to perform tasks under supervision not requiring occupational therapy professional knowledge or judgment;

Accepting payment for any part of professional services delivered as a volunteer;

Obtaining a license by means of fraud, misrepresentation or concealment of material facts;

Violating any lawful order, rule or regulation adopted by the board;

Violating any provision of this act.

“This act” means W.S.

33-40-101

through

33-40-115

.

History.

Laws 1991, ch. 189, § 1; 1999, ch. 69, § 2; 2016 ch. 104, §§ 1, 2, effective July 1, 2016; 2020 ch. 87, § 1, effective July 1, 2020.

The 2016 amendments. —

The first 2016 amendment, by ch. 104 § 1, effective July 1, 2016, rewrote (a)(ii), which formerly read, “‘Certified occupational therapy assistant’ means a person licensed to assist in the practice of occupational therapy, under this act, and who works under the supervision of a registered occupational therapist”; in (a)(iii), substituted “means” for “is the use of purposeful activity with individuals who are limited by physical injury or illness, psychosocial dysfunction, developmental or learning disabilities or the aging process in order to maximize independence, prevent disability and maintain health. The practice encompasses evaluation, treatment and consultation. Specific occupational therapy services include but are not limited to the following services provided individually, in groups or through social systems”; added (a)(iii)(J) through (a)(iii)(P); in (a)(iv), substituted “‘Occupational therapist’ for ‘Registered occupational therapist’”; redesignated(a)(v) as (a)(vii); added (a)(v) and (a)(vi); and in (a)(vii) substituted “33-40-115” for “33-40-117.”

The second 2016 amendment, by ch. 104 § 2, effective July 1, 2016, repealed former (a)(iii)(A) through (a)(iii)(H), which read:
“(A) Teaching daily living skills; “(B) Developing perceptual-motor skills and sensory integrative functioning; “(C) Developing play skills and prevocational and leisure capacities; “(D) Assessing the need for designing, fabricating, training in the use of or applying selected orthotic devices or selective adaptive equipment; “(E) Assessing the need for and training in the use of prosthetic devices; “(F) Using specifically designed crafts and exercises to enhance functional performance; “(G) Administering and interpreting tests such as manual muscle and range of motion; and “(H) Adapting environments for the handicapped.”

The 2020 amendment,

effective July 1, 2020, in (a)(vi)(H) and (a)(vi)(N) substituted “judgment” for “judgement.”

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

§ 33-40-103.
License required.

No person shall hold himself out as an occupational therapist, an occupational therapy assistant or as being able to practice occupational therapy in Wyoming unless he is licensed under this act or is otherwise authorized under the Occupational Therapy Licensure Compact under W.S.

33-40-202

through

33-40-216

. An unlicensed person holding himself out as an occupational therapist or occupational therapist assistant by using additional or modifying words in his title, printed materials, advertisements or otherwise shall be deemed to be holding himself out as an occupational therapist or occupational therapist assistant.

Repealed by Laws 2016, ch. 104, § 2.

Only an individual may be licensed under this act and no entity, either private or governmental, shall hold itself out as providing occupational therapy to any person unless all individuals providing occupational therapy are licensed under this act.

History.

Laws 1991, ch. 189, § 1; 2016 ch. 104, §§
1, 2, effective July 1, 2016; 2022 ch. 54, § 2, effective July 1, 2022.

The 2016 amendments. —

The first
2016 amendment, by ch. 104 § 1, effective July 1, 2016, rewrote (a), which formerly read, “Effective on July 1, 1992, no person shall hold himself out as an occupational therapist, registered occupational therapist, occupational therapy assistant or certified occupational therapy assistant or as being able to practice occupational therapy in Wyoming unless he is licensed under this act”; and in (c) added the language following “act.”

The second 2016 amendment, by ch. 104 § 2, effective July 1, 2016, repealed former (b), which read: “Nothing in this act shall be construed as preventing or restricting the services or activities of persons under the direction of a licensed occupational therapist.”

The 2022 amendment,

effective July 1, 2022, added “or is otherwise authorized under the Occupational Therapy Licensure Compact under W.S.

33-40-202

through

33-40-216

” in the first sentence of (a).

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to throughout this section, see § 33-40-102(a)(v).

§ 33-40-104.
Persons and practices not affected.

Nothing in this act shall be construed as preventing or restricting the practice, services or activities of:

Any person solely employed as an occupational therapist or occupational therapy assistant by any agency of the United States government;

Any person pursuing a degree or certificate in occupational therapy at an accredited or board approved program when the person is designated by title clearly indicating his status as a student or trainee;

Any person engaged in the supervised fieldwork to complete the necessary educational requirements of W.S.

33-40-106

;

Any person performing occupational therapy or acting as an occupational therapy assistant for no more than twenty (20) days in a calendar year for the purpose of educating students or providing continuing education to persons licensed under this act if:

The person is licensed or regulated under the law of another state which has licensure or regulatory requirements at least as stringent as the requirements of this act;

Repealed by Laws 2016, ch. 104, § 2.

History.

Laws 1991, ch. 189, § 1; 2016 ch. 104, §§
1, 2, effective July 1, 2016.

The 2016 amendments. —

The first
2016 amendment, by ch. 104 § 2, effective July 1, 2016, in (a)(iii), inserted “educational” preceding “requirements” and substituted “33-40-106” for “33-40-106(a)(iii)”; in (a)(iv), in the introductory language, substituted “or acting as an occupational therapy assistant” for “services,” “twenty (20)” for “forty-five (45),” and “for the purpose of educating students or providing continuing education to persons” for “in association with an occupational therapist,” and made stylistic changes.

The second 2016 amendment, by ch. 104 § 2, effective July 1, 2016, repealed former (a)(iv)(B), which read: “The person meets the requirements for certification as an occupational therapist registered (OTR) or as a certified occupational therapy assistant (COTA), established by the American occupational therapy certification board.”

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to throughout this section, see § 33-40-102(a)(v).

§ 33-40-105.
Limited permit. [Repealed]

History.

Laws 1991, ch. 189, § 1; repealed by 2016 ch. 104, § 2, effective July 1, 2016.

§ 33-40-106.
Requirements for licensure; continuing education.

An applicant applying for a license as an occupational therapist or occupational therapy assistant under this act, shall file a specified written application showing to the satisfaction of the board that the applicant:

Has a good reputation for honesty, trustworthiness and competence in all matters relevant to practicing the profession of occupational therapy;

Has successfully completed the academic requirements in occupational therapy in an approved program that is accredited by the American Occupational Therapy Association’s Accreditation Council for Occupational Therapy Education (ACOTE) or a successor organization as established in rule and approved by the licensure board;

Has successfully completed a period of supervised fieldwork experience required by the recognized educational institution where the applicant met the academic requirements described in paragraph (ii) of this subsection; and

Has passed a national certification examination as provided in W.S.

33-40-107

.

The board may establish continuing education requirements for an active license provided that:

The requirement shall not be more than sixteen (16) contact hours of continuing education per year; and

Continuing education taken any time in the three (3) years preceding the annual license renewal may be counted toward fulfilling the requirement but it shall not be counted more than once.

Repealed by Laws 2016, ch. 104, § 2.

Repealed by Laws 2011, ch. 129, § 202.

History.

Laws 1991, ch. 189, § 1; 2011, ch. 129, § 202; 2012, ch. 98, § 1; 2016 ch. 104, §§
1, 2, effective July 1, 2016; 2022 ch. 54, § 2, effective July 1, 2022.

The 2011 amendment,

effective July 1, 2011, repealed former (b)(iv), which read: “Persons licensed before July 1, 1992 shall not be required to complete continuing education requirements before July 1, 1994.”

The 2012 amendment,

made stylistic change in (b)(ii) and (b)(iii).

Laws 2012, ch. 98 § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 15, 2012.

The 2016 amendments. —

The first
2016 amendment, by ch. 104 § 1, effective July 1, 2016, in the introductory language of (a), substituted “an occupational” for “a registered” and deleted “as a certified”; in (a)(i), substituted “therapy” for “therapist”; rewrote (a)(ii), which formerly read, “Has successfully completed the academic requirements in occupational therapy in an approved program that is accredited by the committee on allied health education and accreditation, American Medical Association in collaboration with the American Occupational Therapy Association, Inc. The certified occupational therapy assistant program shall be approved by the American Occupational Therapy Association, Inc.”; rewrote (a)(iii), which formerly read, ” Has successfully completed the academic requirements in occupational therapy in an approved program that is accredited by the committee on allied health education and accreditation, American Medical Association in collaboration with the American Occupational Therapy Association, Inc. The certified occupational therapy assistant program shall be approved by the American Occupational Therapy Association, Inc.”; in (a)(iv), substituted “a national certification” for “an” preceding “examination”; and in (b), made stylistic changes.

The second 2016 amendment, by ch. 104 § 2, effective July 1, 2016, repealed former (b)(iii), which read: “The board may allow other means of continuing education in place of formal instruction.”

While neither amendment gave effect to the other, both have been given effect in this section as set out above.

The 2022 amendment,

effective July 1, 2022, added “under this act,” in the introductory language of (a).

§ 33-40-107.
Examination for license of occupational therapists and occupational therapy assistants.

Repealed by Laws 2016, ch. 104, § 2.

Each applicant for licensure under this act, shall be given a written examination on the basic and clinical sciences relating to occupational therapy, occupational therapy techniques and methods to determine the applicant’s fitness to practice. The board shall designate the examination for occupational therapists and the examination for occupational therapy assistants and shall establish standards for acceptable performance.

Examination shall be conducted as specified by the board not less than two (2) times each year.

History.

Laws 1991, ch. 189, § 1; 2016 ch. 104, §§
1, 2, effective July 1, 2016; 2022 ch. 54, § 2, effective July 1, 2022.

The 2016 amendments.

The first 2016 amendment, by ch. 104 § 1, effective July 1, 2016, in (b), deleted “registered” preceding “occupational therapists” and “certified” preceding “occupational therapy assistants”; and in (c), substituted “not less than two (2) times” for “at least twice.”

The second 2016 amendment, by ch. 104 § 2, effective July 1, 2016, repealed former (a), which read: “Only a person satisfying the requirements of
W.S. 33-40-106(a)(i) through (iii) may apply for an examination as the board shall prescribe. A person who fails an examination may reapply under terms and conditions as the board may prescribe.”

The 2022 amendment,

effective July 1, 2022, added “under this act,” in the first sentence of (b).

§ 33-40-108.
Waiver of requirements; temporary licenses.

The board shall grant a license under this act, to any person certified prior to July 1, 1992 as an occupational therapist registered (OTR) or as a certified occupational therapy assistant (COTA) by the American occupational therapy certification board (AOTCB).

Repealed by Laws 2016, ch. 104, § 2.

The board may establish provisions for a temporary license under this act so an applicant may practice occupational therapy without supervision or act as an occupational therapy assistant with supervision during processing of the license application.

The board may establish provisions for a limited license to practice occupational therapy under supervision or act as an occupational therapy assistant with supervision to applicants under this act who are waiting to take the national certification examination or who are awaiting scores.

History.

Laws 1991, ch. 189, § 1; 2016 ch. 104, §§
1, 2, effective July 1, 2016; 2022 ch. 54, § 2, effective July 1, 2022.

The 2016 amendments. —

The first 2016 amendment, by ch. 104 § 1, effective July 1, 2016, in (a), deleted the second sentence, which formerly read, “The board may waive the examination, education, or experience requirements and grant a license to any person certified by the AOTCB after July 1, 1992, if the board determines the requirements for the certification are equivalent to the requirements for licensure in this act”; in (c), substituted “practice occupational therapy without supervision or act as an occupational therapy assistant with supervision” for “work”; and added (d).

The second 2016 amendment, by ch. 104 § 2, effective July 1, 2016, repealed former (b), which read: “The board may waive the examination, education, or experience requirements and grant a license to any applicant who presents proof of current licensure or regulation as a registered occupational therapist or certified occupational therapy assistant in another state, the District of Columbia, or territory of the United States whose standards for licensure or regulation are equivalent to or at least as stringent as the requirements for licensure of this act.”

The 2022 amendment,

effective July 1, 2022, added “under this act” in (a), (c), and (d).

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in the second sentence in subsection (a) and in subsection (b), see § 33-40-102(a)(v).

§ 33-40-109.
Issuance of license or compact privilege.

The board shall issue a license to any individual who meets the requirements of this act or shall issue a compact privilege to any individual who meets the requirements of the Occupational Therapy Licensure Compact under W.S.

33-40-202

through

33-40-216

, upon payment of the prescribed fee.

History.

Laws 1991, ch. 189, § 1; 2022 ch. 54, § 2, effective July 1, 2022.

The 2022 amendment,

effective July 1, 2022, added “or shall issue a compact privilege to any individual who meets the requirements of the Occupational Therapy Licensure Compact under W.S.

33-40-202

through

33-40-216

” and deleted “license” following “prescribed.”

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 33-40-102(a)(v).

§ 33-40-110.
Renewal of license; reentry.

Any license issued under this act shall be subject to annual renewal as provided by the board, however no late renewal of a license may be granted more than one (1) year after its expiration.

through (e) Repealed by Laws 2016, ch. 104, § 2.

The board shall establish by rule reentry procedures for the licensure of persons under this act who have previously practiced as an occupational therapist or occupational therapy assistant for not less than one (1) year, but who do not qualify for renewal of their license under subsection (a) of this section. The board’s rules may:

Require completion of continuing education not to exceed the cumulative total requirement for a licensed occupational therapist or occupational therapist assistant for three (3) years;

Require completion of a review course approved by the board which shall not be more than thirty (30) days in duration;

Require practice under the supervision of a licensed occupational therapist or occupational therapy assistant for a period of not more than two (2) years;

For a period of not more than two (2) years or until specified training is received, restrict a person from practicing or practicing without supervision specific areas within the practice of occupational therapy which areas have significantly changed or been added to the practice;

Establish guidelines for the length of time the requirements stated in paragraphs (i) through (iv) of this subsection are imposed based on the length of time a person has not engaged in the practice of occupational therapy, the person’s prior experience, the area of practice in which the person intends to engage and other relevant factors.

History.

Laws 1991, ch. 189, § 1; 2016 ch. 104, §§
1, 2, effective July 1, 2016; 2022 ch. 54, § 2, effective July 1, 2022.

The 2016 amendments. —

The first 2016 amendment, by ch. 104 § 1, effective July 1, 2016, in (a), substituted “one (1) year” for “five (5) years”; and added (f).

The second 2016 amendment, by ch. 104 § 1, effective July 1, 2016, repealed former (b) through (e), which read: “(b) The board shall grant inactive status to a licensee who: “(i) Does not practice as a registered occupational therapist or a certified occupational therapy assistant; and “(ii) Does not hold himself out as a registered occupational therapist or a certified occupational therapy assistant. “(c) A person on inactive status may return to active status within five (5) years of being placed on inactive status by paying the annual renewal fee. “(d) A person who has been on inactive status for more than five (5) years may obtain a license by: “(i) Practicing under a limited permit provided by W.S.

33-40-105

for twelve (12) weeks. The board shall require evidence of satisfactory performance under the limited permit as a condition of obtaining a license. The evidence shall include as a minimum a report from the registered occupational therapist supervising the practice of the person under a limited permit that the person's performance was satisfactory. If the person's performance under the limited permit was unsatisfactory, the board may require further practice under a limited permit or additional education or both and meet other standards as prescribed by the board; “(ii) After three (3) years of experience with limited permits, the board may promulgate rules and regulations making necessary adjustment for the effective implementation of the provisions for limited permits. “(e) A person who has failed to renew a license for more than five (5) years may obtain a license by practicing under a limited permit provided by W.S.

33-40-105

for a period prescribed by the board which shall be at least twelve (12) weeks and not more than twenty-four (24) weeks. The board shall require evidence of satisfactory performance and may impose additional requirements if performance was unsatisfactory in the same manner as provided by W.S. 33-40-110(d)(i).”

The 2022 amendment,

effective July 1, 2022, added “under this act” in the introductory language of (f).

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in subsection (a), see § 33-40-102(a)(v).

§ 33-40-111.
Foreign trained applicants; applicants from other states and territories.

Occupational therapists and occupational therapy assistants trained outside of the United States and its possessions shall satisfy the examination requirements of W.S.

33-40-107

to be licensed under this act. The board shall require these applicants to meet the standards established in W.S.

33-40-106

.

The board shall, to the extent necessary, waive examination, education, and continuing education requirements and grant a license under this act to any applicant who presents proof of current licensure or regulation as an occupational therapist or occupational therapy assistant in another state, the District of Columbia, or territory of the United States whose standards for licensure or regulation include passage of the examination required for licensure under this act and who has not been disciplined in the other jurisdiction for unprofessional conduct or a similar offense. The board may grant licensure to an applicant who has been disciplined for unprofessional conduct if in the board’s judgment the unprofessional conduct was sufficiently minor, has been rectified or is sufficiently in the past so as not to present a risk to the welfare or safety of Wyoming patients.

History.

Laws 1991, ch. 189, § 1; 2016 ch. 104, § 1, effective July 1, 2016; 2021 ch. 149, § 1, effective July 1, 2021; 2022 ch. 54, § 2, effective July 1, 2022.

The 2016 amendment

, effective July 1, 2016, added (b); and substituted “33-40-107” for “33-40-106(a)(iv)” and “33-40-106” for “33-40-106(a)(i) through (iii)” in (a).

The 2021 amendment,

effective July 1, 2021, substituted “has” for “have” following “under this act and who” in (b).

The 2022 amendment,

effective July 1, 2022, added “to be licensed under this act” in the first sentence of (a); and added “under this act” following “grant a license” in the first sentence of (b).

§ 33-40-112.
Fees.

The board, pursuant to W.S.

33-1-201

, shall prescribe fees for implementing this act.

History.

Laws 1991, ch. 189, § 1; 1992, ch. 56, § 2.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 33-40-102(a)(v).

§ 33-40-113.
Suspension and revocation of license; refusal to renew.

In accordance with this act and after the hearing authorized by subsection (b) of this section, the board may deny a license or refuse to renew a license, may suspend or revoke a license, or may impose probationary conditions if the licensee or the applicant for a license has engaged in unprofessional conduct which has endangered or is likely to endanger the health, welfare or safety of the public. Unprofessional conduct shall mean the conduct defined in W.S. 33-40-102(a)(vi).

through (vi) Repealed by Laws 2016, ch. 104, § 2.

A denial, refusal to renew, suspension, revocation or imposition of probationary conditions upon a license may be ordered by the board under this act after a hearing in the manner provided by the rules and regulations adopted by the board. An application for reinstatement may be made to the board one (1) year after the date of the revocation of a license. The board may accept or reject an application for reinstatement and may hold a hearing to consider the reinstatement. Any person aggrieved by any final action of the board may appeal to the district court under the provisions of the Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act, W.S.

16-3-101

through

16-3-115

.

Upon receipt from the department of family services of a certified copy of an order from a court to withhold, suspend or otherwise restrict a license issued by the board under this act, the board shall notify the party named in the court order of the withholding, suspension or restriction of the license in accordance with the terms of the court order. No appeal under the Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act shall be allowed for a license withheld, suspended or restricted under this subsection.

History.

Laws 1991, ch. 189, § 1; 1997, ch. 128, § 2; 2016 ch. 104, §§
1, 2, effective July 1, 2016; 2022 ch. 54, § 2, effective July 1, 2022.

The 2016 amendments. —

The first 2016 amendment, by ch. 104 § 1, effective July 1, 2016, in (a) substituted “Unprofessional conduct shall mean the conduct defined in
W.S. 33-40-102(a)(vi)” for “For purposes of this section, unprofessional conduct includes,” and made a stylistic change.

The second 2016 amendment, by ch. 104 § 2, effective July 1, 2016, repealed former (a)(i) through (a)(vi), which read: “(i) Obtaining a license by means of fraud, misrepresentation or concealment of material facts; “(ii) Being guilty of unprofessional conduct as defined by the rules established by the board, or violating the code of ethics adopted and published by the board; “(iii) Being convicted of a felony; “(iv) Being convicted of a misdemeanor which the board defines as being unprofessional in any court; “(v) Violating any lawful order, rule or regulation rendered or adopted by the board; and “(vi) Violating any provision of this act.”

The 2022 amendment,

effective July 1, 2022, added “In accordance with this act and” at the beginning of (a); added “under this act” in the first sentence of (b); added “under this act” in the first sentence of (c); and made a related change.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in subsection (a)(vi), see § 33-40-102(a)(v).

§ 33-40-114.
Board of occupational therapy practice; established; compensation.

There is established a board of occupational therapy within the department of administration and information. The board shall consist of five (5) members appointed by the governor, who are residents of Wyoming. Three (3) board members shall be occupational therapists who have been engaged in providing occupational therapy services to the public, teaching or research in occupational therapy for at least five (5) years immediately preceding their appointments. One (1) board member shall be an occupational therapy assistant who shall have been engaged in providing occupational therapy services to the public, teaching or research in occupational therapy for at least five (5) years immediately preceding his appointment. An occupational therapist may be appointed to this position if no occupational therapy assistant is available and willing to serve. These four (4) members shall at all times be holders of valid licenses under this act. The remaining member shall be a member of the public with an interest in the rights of the consumers of health services.

Appointments to the board of occupational therapy shall be for three (3) year terms. No person shall serve more than two (2) consecutive terms. Terms shall begin on the first day of the fiscal year and end on the last day of the fiscal year or until successors are appointed. Vacancies in the membership of the board shall be filled for the unexpired term by the governor. The governor may remove any board member as provided by W.S.

9-1-202

.

The board shall meet not less than two (2) times during each fiscal year and shall select a chairman at the first meeting. Other meetings may be convened at the call of the chairman or the written request of any two (2) board members. A majority of the members of the board shall constitute a quorum for all purposes. All meetings of the board shall be governed in accordance with W.S.

16-4-403

. In addition the board may hold closed sessions:

and (ii) Repealed by Laws 2016, ch. 104, § 2.

To consider allegations or investigations of possible unprofessional conduct as defined by W.S. 33-40-102(a)(vi).

Members of the board shall receive per diem and mileage as provided in W.S. 33-1-302(a)(vii).

History.

Laws 1991, ch. 189, § 1; 1999, ch. 69, § 2; 2014 ch. 69, § 2, effective July 1, 2014; 2016 ch. 104, §§
1, 2, effective July 1, 2016.

The 2014 amendment,

effective July 1, 2014, substituted “33-1-301(a)(vii)” for “9-3-102” in (d).

The 2016 amendments. —

The first 2016 amendment, by ch. 104 § 1, effective July 1, 2016, in (a), deleted “registered” preceding “occupational therapists” near the beginning, in the fourth sentence substituted “ an occupational therapy assistant” for “a certified occupational therapy assistant” and “five (5)” for “three (3),” and in the fifth sentence substituted “An occupational therapist” for “A registered occupational therapist” and deleted “certified” preceding “occupational therapy assistant”; in (b), substituted “Appointments to the board of occupational therapy“ for “By July 1, 1991 the governor shall appoint two (2) board members for a term of one (1) year, two (2) board members for a term of two (2) years and one (1) for a term of three (3) years. Appointments made thereafter,” and deleted “except for the first appointed members who shall serve through the last fiscal day of the year in which they are appointed” following “appointed”; near the beginning of (c), substituted “not less than two (2) times during each fiscal year and shall select a chairman at the first meeting” for “during the first month of each fiscal year to select a chairman and for other purposes. At least one (1) additional meeting shall be held before the end of each fiscal year”; and in (c)(iii), substituted “33-40-102(a)(vi)” for “33-40-113.”

The second 2016 amendment, by ch. 104 § 2, effective July 1, 2016, repealed former (c)(i) and (c)(ii), which read: “(i) To approve examinations; “(ii) Upon request of an applicant who fails an examination, to prepare a response indicating any reason for the applicant's failure; or.”

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in the next-to-last sentence in subsection (a), see §

33-40-102

(a)(v).

§ 33-40-115.
Board of occupational therapy practice; powers and duties.

The board shall administer the provisions of this act and the Occupational Therapy Licensure Compact under W.S.

33-40-202

through

33-40-216

, and may investigate allegations of practices violating the provisions of this act or of the compact.

The board shall establish rules and regulations according to the Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act to carry out the purpose of this act, including establishing rules for professional conduct, for professional licensure and to establish ethical standards of practice for persons licensed to practice occupational therapy in Wyoming.

The board may delegate its authority to issue temporary and limited licenses pursuant to W.S.

33-40-108

to the executive secretary of the board. The board may limit the delegation or set forth any criteria for exercising the delegation as it deems appropriate.

The board may, with the approval and assistance of the attorney general, petition the district court in the name of the state of Wyoming to enjoin:

Any person from continuing to violate W.S.

33-40-103

or section 4 of the Occupational Therapy Licensure Compact under W.S.

33-40-206

;

Any person or other entity from advertising or claiming to provide occupational therapy services in this state when the services are not or will not be provided by a person licensed under this act or is otherwise authorized under the Occupational Therapy Licensure Compact under W.S.

33-40-202

through

33-40-216

.

History.

Laws 1991, ch. 189, § 1; 2016 ch. 104, § 1, effective July 1, 2016; 2022 ch. 54, § 2, effective July 1, 2022.

The 2016 amendment

, effective July 1, 2016, in (c), inserted “and limited” following “temporary” and substituted “33-40-108” for “33-40-108(c) and limited permits pursuant to W.S.

33-40-105

.”

The 2022 amendment,

effective July 1, 2022, in (a), added “and the Occupational Therapy Licensure Compact under W.S.

33-40-202

through

33-40-216

,” added “or of the compact”; added “or section 4 of the Occupational Therapy Licensure Compact under W.S.

33-40-206

” in (d)(i); and added “or is otherwise authorized under the Occupational Therapy Licensure Compact under W.S.

33-40-202

through

33-40-216

” in (d)(ii).

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to throughout this section, see § 33-40-102(a)(v).

Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act. —

See § 16-3-101(a), (b)(xi).

§ 33-40-116.
Board of occupational therapy practices employees; funds.

The board shall appoint or contract an executive secretary and other individuals deemed necessary to administer the affairs of the board and shall furnish necessary support and clerical services. Costs related to these services shall be paid from the funds of the Wyoming board of occupational therapy.

History.

Laws 1991, ch. 189, § 1.

§ 33-40-117.
Penalties.

Any person who violates any provision of W.S.

33-40-103

is guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by imprisonment of not more than six (6) months, a fine of not more than seven hundred fifty dollars ($750.00), or both.

History.

Laws 1991, ch. 189, § 1.